test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-43kanarik_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kanarik: # Noun (43) kanarik 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kanarik+N+Sg+Nom: kanarik
     kanarik+N+Sg+Gen: kanarigu
     kanarik+N+Sg+Par: kanarikku
     kanarik+N+Sg+Ill: kanarikku
     kanarik+N+Sg+Ine: kanarigun
     kanarik+N+Sg+Ela: kanarigust
     kanarik+N+Sg+All: kanarigulõ
     kanarik+N+Sg+Ade: kanarigul
     kanarik+N+Sg+Abl: kanarigult
     kanarik+N+Sg+Tra: kanarigus
     kanarik+N+Sg+Ter: kanariguniq
     kanarik+N+Sg+Abe: kanariguldaq
     kanarik+N+Sg+Com: kanarigugaq
     kanarik+N+Pl+Nom: kanariguq
     kanarik+N+Pl+Gen: kanarikkõ
     kanarik+N+Pl+Par: kanarikkõ
     kanarik+N+Pl+Ill: kanarikkõhe
     kanarik+N+Pl+Ine: kanarigõn
     kanarik+N+Pl+Ela: kanarigõst
     kanarik+N+Pl+All: kanarigõlõ
     kanarik+N+Pl+Ade: kanarigõl
     kanarik+N+Pl+Abl: kanarigõlt
     kanarik+N+Pl+Tra: kanarigõs
     kanarik+N+Pl+Ter: kanarigõniq
     kanarik+N+Pl+Abe: kanarigõldaq
     kanarik+N+Pl+Com: kanarigõgaq
